Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-3107
Act; applicability.

The Structured Settlements Transfers Protection Act applies to any transfer of structured settlement payment rights under a transfer agreement entered into on or after January 1, 2002.

Laws 2001, LB 55, § 7.